apertium-es-ssp.ssp.dix
<pardef n="/shol:eumawe__vblex">
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>shol:eumawe</l> 
        <r>shol:eumawe<s n="vblex"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e>
      <p>
        <l>shol:eumawe</l> 
        <r>shol:eumawe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>shol:eumawe</l> 
        <r>shol:eumawe<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>   
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>shol:eumawe</l> 
        <r>shol:eumawe<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e> 
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>shol:eumawe</l> 
        <r>shol:eumawe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>  
 <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>shol:eumawe</l> 
        <r>shol:eumawe<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s  n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>shol:eumawe</l> 
        <r>shol:eumawe<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s  n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>sèìméha:v.èìmac</l> 
        <r>shol:eumawe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
     <e>
      <p>
        <l>sèìméha:v.èìmac</l> 
        <r>shol:eumawe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
   

   <e>
      <p>
        <l>shel:eumawo</l> 
        <r>shol:eumawe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>shel:eumawo</l> 
        <r>shol:eumawe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ylshel:euwoo</l> 
        <r>shol:eumawe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ylshel:euwoo</l> 
        <r>shol:eumawe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

  <e>
      <p>
        <l>shol:eumawe</l> 
        <r>shol:eumawe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>shol:eumawery</l> 
        <r>shol:eumawe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

  <e>
      <p>
        <l>sèìméha:v.èìmac</l> 
        <r>shol:eumawe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>sèìméha:v.èìmac</l> 
        <r>shol:eumawe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


 <e>
      <p>
        <l>ylshy:eumamawei</l> 
        <r>shol:eumawe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ylshy:eumamaweiry</l> 
        <r>shol:eumawe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
   <e>
      <p>
        <l>shol:eumawey</l> 
        <r>shol:eumawe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>shol:eumaweyroi</l> 
        <r>shol:eumawe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>shol:eumamuwy</l> 
        <r>shol:eumawe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>shol:eumamuwyro</l> 
        <r>shol:eumawe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
 
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>shol:eumawei</l> 
        <r>shol:eumawe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>shol:eumaweirei</l> 
        <r>shol:eumawe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>




<pardef n="/ohsòmimuca:ömamawe__vblex">
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ohsòmimuca:ömamawe</l> 
        <r>ohsòmimuca:ömamawe<s n="vblex"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e>
      <p>
        <l>ohsòmimuca:ömamawe</l> 
        <r>ohsòmimuca:ömamawe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>ohsòmimuca:ömamawe</l> 
        <r>ohsòmimuca:ömamawe<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>   
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>ohsòmimuca:ömamawe</l> 
        <r>ohsòmimuca:ömamawe<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e> 
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>ohsòmimuca:ömamawe</l> 
        <r>ohsòmimuca:ömamawe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e> 
 <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>ohsòmimuca:ömamawe</l> 
        <r>ohsòmimuca:ömamawe<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s  n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>ohsòmimuca:ömamawe</l> 
        <r>ohsòmimuca:ömamawe<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s  n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ohsòmimuca:ömamawe</l> 
        <r>ohsòmimuca:ömamawe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
     <e>
      <p>
        <l>ohsòmimuca:ömamawe</l> 
        <r>ohsòmimuca:ömamawe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
   

   <e>
      <p>
        <l>ohsòmimuca:ömamawo</l> 
        <r>ohsòmimuca:ömamawe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ohsòmimuca:ömamawo</l> 
        <r>ohsòmimuca:ömamawe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ylohsòmimuca:ömamawoo</l> 
        <r>ohsòmimuca:ömamawe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ylohsòmimuca:ömamawoo</l> 
        <r>ohsòmimuca:ömamawe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

  <e>
      <p>
        <l>ohsòmimuca:ömamawe</l> 
        <r>ohsòmimuca:ömamawe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ohsòmimuca:ömamawe</l> 
        <r>ohsòmimuca:ömamawe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

  <e>
      <p>
        <l>ohsòmimuca:ömamawe</l> 
        <r>ohsòmimuca:ömamawe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ohsòmimuca:ömamawe</l> 
        <r>ohsòmimuca:ömamawe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


 <e>
      <p>
        <l>ohsòmimuca:ömamawe</l> 
        <r>ohsòmimuca:ömamawe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ohsòmimuca:ömamawe</l> 
        <r>ohsòmimuca:ömamawe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
   <e>
      <p>
        <l>ohsòmimuca:ömamawey</l> 
        <r>ohsòmimuca:ömamawe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ohsòmimuca:ömamawey</l> 
        <r>ohsòmimuca:ömamawe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ohsòmimuca:ömamawey</l> 
        <r>ohsòmimuca:ömamawe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ohsòmimuca:ömamawey</l> 
        <r>ohsòmimuca:ömamawe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
 
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ohsòmimuca:ömamawei</l> 
        <r>ohsòmimuca:ömamawe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ohsòmimuca:ömamawei</l> 
        <r>ohsòmimuca:ömamawe<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

<e lm="shol:eumawe"><par n="/shol:eumawe__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ohsòmimuca:ömamawe"><par n="/ohsòmimuca:ömamawe__vblex"/></e>
